Tennessee, session 114, SB1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-104, is amended by deleting
the language in the section and substituting:
Unless a court orders otherwise, the petitioner shall pay the costs of this
application.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to court orders issued on or after the effective date of this act.
SB1203
003280
- 1 -